Utah statutes.
31A-22-519.   Death pending conversion.

If a person insured under a group life insurance policy, or the insured dependent of that person, dies during the period of eligibility for conversion under Section 31A-22-517 or 31A-22-518 and before the individual policy becomes effective, the amount of life insurance to which he would have been entitled is payable as a claim under the group policy, whether or not application for the individual policy or the payment of the first premium has been made.



Enacted by Chapter 242, 1985 General Session

